Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 4. Brucellosis Test of Cattle

Cross references. —

As to tuberculin tests of dairy cattle, see §§

11-19-201

to

11-19-215

.

As to sale, etc., of diseased cattle, see §

11-19-214

.

As to tuberculosis modified accredited areas, see
§§

11-19-303

to

11-19-306

.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 122, § 1, appropriates $1,650,605 from the general fund to the livestock board for the compensation of livestock producers related to the testing for brucellosis in the state. The compensation for surveillance testing may be paid at not more than $3.50 per head of cattle actually tested. Payment is to be made monthly directly to accredited veterinarians who perform brucellosis testing as mandated by rule of the Wyoming livestock board or the United States department of agriculture animal plant and health inspection service upon submission of a notarized invoice indicating the number of head tested, ownership of the animals tested and testing location. Up to $150,000 of this appropriation may be expended by the livestock board to purchase necessary brucellosis testing equipment, supplies and postage.

Laws 2004, ch. 122, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 16, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66 to 68, 73 to 98; 36A C.J.S. Food §§ 3 to 49.

§ 11-19-401.
Tagging, branding and disposition of cattle reacting to test;
penalties for failure to comply.

All
livestock animals in Wyoming reacting to
a confirmatory test for brucellosis (Bang’s
disease)
shall be immediately permanently branded with a hot iron letter “B” on
the left
tailhead by or in the presence of an
officially authorized veterinarian. All such
reactor livestock animals shall be disposed
of for slaughter or diagnostic purposes only, upon and according to written instruction from the Wyoming
livestock board. Any person who violates any provision of this section
shall be punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

. As used in this section,
“confirmatory test” means a test for brucellosis that has the specificity
and sensitivity to verify the presence or absence of brucella abortus
in animal serum or tissues and is used to confirm results from an
initial brucellosis test.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 13, § 1; 1957, ch. 42, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-314; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-401; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to sale of diseased cattle, see §

11-19-214

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-19-402.
Breeding cattle and bison entering state to show evidence of
negative test or vaccination for brucellosis; exceptions.

All breeding cattle and
bison entering Wyoming shall be accompanied by a proper
health certificate showing evidence of a negative blood test for brucellosis
made within thirty (30) days prior to entry, or evidence of being
officially vaccinated by a licensed veterinarian during calfhood against
brucellosis. Breeding cattle and
bison originating
from brucellosis free areas and from certified
brucellosis free herds entering Wyoming may be exempt from this section
but must be accompanied by a proper health certificate.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 60, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 11-314.1; Laws 1965, ch. 19, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-402; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “bison” for “buffalo” twice and deleted “modified certified brucellosis areas, certified” before “brucellosis free areas.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

§ 11-19-403.
When cattle or bison exempt from provisions.

Breeding cattle and bison entering Wyoming for the purpose of feeding only
may be exempt from the requirements of W.S.

11-19-402

if they are placed under quarantine by the rules and
regulations promulgated by the Wyoming livestock board.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 60, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 11-314.2; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-403; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “bison” for “buffalo.”

§ 11-19-404.
Applicability of provisions.

The Wyoming livestock
board shall determine which of the requirements set forth in W.S.

11-19-402

through

11-19-404

apply to the various counties or areas within Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 60, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 11-314.3; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-404; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1.

§ 11-19-405.
Control
of brucellosis; governor authorized to negotiate with federal agencies.

In order to preserve the brucellosis-free status of this state, the governor shall enter into negotiations with any relevant parties including appropriate federal agencies on steps necessary to ensure brucellosis is not passed from wildlife to livestock.

The governor may direct any state agency to take any actions needed to ensure brucellosis does not spread from wildlife to livestock.

In the event of a confirmed outbreak of brucellosis, the governor may authorize the state veterinarian, with the approval of the Wyoming livestock board, to require brucellosis testing of all test eligible bovine or domestic bison at the farm or ranch of origin or any licensed Wyoming livestock market prior to a change of ownership for a period of up to eighteen (18) months. At the end of the required testing period, the state veterinarian shall review the testing requirement and may reimpose brucellosis testing for one (1) or more successive periods under this subsection if there is deemed by the state veterinarian to be a threat to Wyoming’s brucellosis free status or if the state is designated as brucellosis class A or lower status.

The state veterinarian may direct any Wyoming brand inspector to withhold a brand inspection for movement or change of ownership to any person who has not shown evidence of any required brucellosis test.

As part of the state brucellosis surveillance and prevention program, the state veterinarian may require brucellosis testing of any test eligible bovine or domestic bison at any licensed Wyoming livestock market at any time. Failure to comply shall result in a suspension of the livestock market’s license.

Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be punished as provided by W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 96, § 1; 2005, ch. 18, § 2; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

The 2005 amendment

added (c) through (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted the former last sentence, which read: “If adequate progress is not made by September 1, 1996, in the negotiations or if the appropriate federal agencies are unwilling to act to control brucellosis or are obstructing necessary efforts to control brucellosis, the governor is authorized to direct the attorney general to bring appropriate legal action.”

Task force. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 322, as amended by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, creates the Wyoming brucellosis task force, appointed by the governor, whose purpose is to propose recommendations for policies, rules and legislation to combat brucellosis. The task force may contract with consultants as necessary to perform its duties. Not later than December 31, 2004 the task force is to report its recommendations to the governor and the legislature. The act appropriates $125,000 from the general fund to the department of agriculture for purposes of the act.

§ 11-19-406.
Sale
of diseased cattle or domestic bison.

All cattle or domestic
bison in Wyoming lawfully found to be affected with brucellosis, including
all sexually intact cattle or domestic bison that are part of a herd
found to be affected with brucellosis, may be shipped or transported
under the direction of the state veterinarian to livestock markets
and sold for immediate slaughter or transferred to an approved slaughter
facility or veterinary diagnostic laboratory in accordance with federal
regulations. Payments under this section shall not be made by the
state for any sexually intact female cattle or bison which are over
twelve (12) months old and which are not official calfhood vaccinates
as provided in board rule and regulation. Producers may be eligible
for indemnification in accordance with W.S.

11-19-106

for any livestock ordered disposed pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 18, § 1; 2012, ch. 90, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Prior to directing that any cattle or bison that are part of an infected herd be sold under this section, the state veterinarian shall ascertain that sufficient funds are available from either federal or state sources to ensure that the owner of the condemned cattle or domestic bison will be paid the difference between the market value at the time of quarantine and the amount received for the sale, less any amount of reimbursement provided for and paid under federal law or regulation, the cost of shipping or transportation and commission charges,” and added the present last sentence.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon passage. Approved February 17, 2005.

§ 11-19-407.
Brucellosis testing program.

The livestock board shall develop a brucellosis surveillance program in any designated surveillance area as defined by the livestock board and any area of concern designated by the board and approved by the governor as an area where risk of exposure to documented infected wildlife is of concern. The program may be conducted with the help of veterinary practitioners and livestock auction markets. This program shall provide for the testing of livestock for brucellosis, for spaying heifers and for adult vaccinations only to the extent that may be reasonably necessary to maintain or to regain the brucellosis-free status of the state of Wyoming. Compensation under this program for all purposes except mandatory testing or testing within an area of concern as designated by the board and approved by the governor shall be pursuant to the terms of a livestock herd plan that has been entered into between the livestock producer and the Wyoming state veterinarian.

The compensation for brucellosis surveillance testing, spaying heifers and adult vaccinations shall be paid at not less than one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per head and not more than eight dollars ($8.00) per head of cattle actually tested, spayed or adult vaccinated. Compensation for brucellosis testing, spaying or adult vaccinating may include the purchase of brucellosis testing, spaying or adult vaccinating equipment, supplies and postage.

Payments under subsection (b) of this section shall be made monthly directly to accredited veterinarians who perform brucellosis testing, spaying, adult vaccinating and surveillance planning or to livestock auction markets that use their facilities and veterinarians to conduct brucellosis testing, spaying or adult vaccinating as mandated by rule of the Wyoming livestock board or the United States department of agriculture animal plant and health inspection service. The payment shall be made upon submission to the Wyoming livestock board of a notarized invoice indicating the number of head tested, spayed or adult vaccinated, the ownership of the animals tested, spayed or adult vaccinated and the testing, spaying or adult vaccinating location.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 119, § 1; 2009, ch. 17, § 1; 2014 ch. 83, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), substituted “surveillance” for “testing” and “in the designated surveillance area as defined by the livestock board. The program” for “which,” inserted “or to regain,” inserted all references to “spaying heifers and adult vaccinations” in (a) through (c); and added the last sentence.

Laws 2009, ch. 17, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

The 2014 amendment,

in the first sentence of (a), substituted “any” for “the” and inserted “and any area of concern designated by the board and approved by the governor as an area where risk of exposure to documented infected wildlife is of concern” preceding the period, in the middle of the fourth sentence, inserted “or testing within an area of concern as designated by the board and approved by the governor.”

Laws 2014, ch. 83, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 119, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.